Illinois, session 104th, SB2906.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Transportation Network Driver Labor Relations Act. 6    Section 2. Findings; legislative intent; construction. 7    (a) The General Assembly finds that the growing rate of 8technological advancement has fundamentally altered the way 9that many people work within the State in the transportation 10sector, in which companies connect, through an online 11application, persons seeking passenger transportation services 12to persons willing to supply those transportation services. 13These persons willing to supply those transportation services, 14known as transportation network drivers, often suffer poor 15pay, inadequate health coverage, and lack of other benefits. 16It is hereby declared that the best interests of the people of 17this State are served by providing transportation network 18drivers the opportunity to self-organize, designate 19representatives of their own choosing, and to bargain 20collectively on a sectoral basis in order to obtain 21sustainable wages, benefits, and working conditions, subject 22to approval and ongoing supervision by the State. It is 23further declared that the best interests of the people of this   SB2906- 2 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1State are served by the prevention or prompt resolution of 2disputes between transportation network companies and the 3transportation network drivers who supply the labor to 4effectuate those services through collective bargaining on a 5sectoral basis, subject to approval and ongoing supervision by 6the State. This Act shall be deemed an exercise of the police 7power of the State for the protection of the public welfare, 8prosperity, health, and peace of the people of the State, and 9shall be liberally construed for the accomplishment of its 10purposes. 11    (b) The General Assembly finds that it is in the public 12policy interests of the State to displace competition with 13regulation of the terms and conditions of work for 14transportation network drivers; and, consistent with this 15policy, to exempt from federal and State antitrust laws any 16conduct authorized under this Act, including the formation of 17transportation network driver organizations and multi-company 18associations for the purposes of collective bargaining on a 19sectoral basis between transportation network companies and 20transportation network drivers on an industry-wide basis, and 21to supervise, evaluate, and if approved, implement the 22resulting sectoral agreements concerning industry regulations 23for the terms and conditions of work for all transportation 24network drivers in an industry when such sectoral agreements 25are found by the Department of Labor to advance the public 26purposes stated in this Section and are then made binding,   SB2906- 3 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1regardless of the anticompetitive consequences thereof.2    (c) It is the intent and policy of the State:3        (1) To grant transportation network drivers the right 4    to form, join, or assist transportation network driver 5    organizations, to be represented through representatives 6    of their own choosing, and to engage in other concerted 7    activities for the purpose of bargaining with 8    transportation network companies and to create negotiated 9    recommendations in the form of a sectoral agreement, which 10    shall form the basis for industry regulations, and for the 11    purpose of other mutual aid or protection; and12        (2) To grant transportation network companies the 13    right to form multi-company associations to represent them 14    while bargaining with a transportation network driver 15    organization to create negotiated recommendations in the 16    form of a sectoral agreement, which shall form the basis 17    for industry regulations.18    (d) The intent and policy of the State is for the statutory 19and non-statutory labor exemptions from the federal antitrust 20laws and analogous State laws to apply to transportation 21network drivers who choose to form, join, or assist labor 22organizations in labor activity, to transportation network 23driver organizations who organize and represent such drivers, 24and to transportation network companies who may choose to form 25an industry association to negotiate on their behalf or 26otherwise engage in labor activity, permitted by this Act.  SB2906- 4 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1    (e) The intent and policy of the State in authorizing and 2regulating transportation network companies, transportation 3network drivers engaging in labor activity, and transportation 4network driver organizations, permitted by this Act, is that 5state action immunity apply to this Act, including the 6sectoral agreement approved by the Department of Labor, and 7that such transportation network companies, transportation 8network drivers, and transportation network driver 9organizations be immune from the federal and State antitrust 10laws to the fullest extent possible in their conduct pursuant 11to this Act.12    (f) The State shall actively supervise the qualified labor 13activity permitted by this Act conducted by transportation 14network companies, transportation network drivers, and 15transportation network driver organizations pursuant to this 16Act to ensure that the conduct permitted by this Act protects 17the rights of workers and companies, encourages collective 18bargaining on a sectoral basis and labor peace, and otherwise 19advances the purposes of this Act. 20    Section 3. Definitions. As used in this Act:21    "Active transportation network driver" and "active TND" 22means a transportation network driver designated pursuant to 23the following process: Within 90 days after the effective date 24of this Act, and once each calendar quarter thereafter, each 25covered transportation network company shall provide the   SB2906- 5 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1Board, in an electronic format determined by the Board, with 2information that identifies all transportation network drivers 3who completed 5 or more rides that originate in the State on 4the covered TNC's platform in the previous 6 months. Each 5covered TNC shall provide this information within 2 weeks 6after the end of each calendar quarter (by April 14 provide TND 7information from rides originating between October 1 and March 831, by July 14 provide TND information from rides originating 9between January 1 and June 30, by October 14 provide TND 10information from rides originating between April 1 and 11September 30, by January 14 provide TND information from rides 12originating between July 1 and December 31). The information 13shall include only the name of the TND, the TND driver's 14license number, and to the extent known by a TNC, the TND's 15mobile phone number, mailing address, email address, and the 16number of rides the TND completed through the covered TNC's 17platform in the previous 6 months. Within 14 days after the 18deadline for submission of the information from covered TNCs 19required in this definition, the Board shall combine the data 20provided by all covered TNCs to determine the distribution of 21the number of rides completed by all TNDs for which data has 22been submitted, and then shall determine the median number of 23rides across TNDs for whom data has been submitted in the 24previous 6 months. Any TND who completed greater than or equal 25to the median number of rides shall be considered an active 26transportation network driver in the rideshare industry. The   SB2906- 6 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1information required to be provided to the Board in this 2definition shall be produced in a manipulable electronic 3format, such as a spreadsheet program consisting of cells 4organized by lettered columns and numbered rows with each data 5point in a separate cell that allows users to sort and perform 6calculations and analysis. The Board may require that the 7information be provided in a specified software program. The 8records and information provided to the Board by 9transportation network companies are exempt from disclosure 10under the Freedom of Information Act.11    "Board" means the State Panel of the Illinois Labor 12Relations Board created by Section 5 of the Illinois Public 13Labor Relations Act.14    "Company union" means any committee, driver representation 15plan, or association of workers or others that exists for the 16purpose, in whole or in part, of dealing with TNCs concerning 17grievances or terms and conditions of work for TNDs: (i) which 18a TNC has initiated or created or whose initiation or creation 19it has suggested or participated in; (ii) which a TNC 20participates in, supervises, or conducts the formulation of 21governing rules or policies, management, operations, or 22elections; or (iii) which the TNC maintains, finances, 23controls, dominates, or assists in maintaining or financing 24unless required to do so by this Act, its implementing rules, 25or any other legal requirement, whether by compensating anyone 26for services performed in its behalf or by donating free   SB2906- 7 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1services, equipment, materials, office or meeting space, or 2anything else of value, or by any other means. 3    A TNC driver organization shall not be deemed a company 4union solely because any of the following are true:5        (1) It has negotiated or been granted the right to 6    designate TNC drivers to be released with pay for the 7    purpose of providing representational services in 8    labor-management affairs on behalf of TNC drivers 9    represented by the TNC driver organization.10        (2) In the course of providing representational 11    services to workers for whom it is the exclusive 12    bargaining representative, a TNC has allowed agents of the 13    TNC driver organization to meet with drivers at the TNC's 14    premises or communicate with TNDs via the TNC's platform.15        (3) It has received from a TNC the voluntary 16    membership dues deductions of TNC drivers or the TNC has 17    processed or transmitted membership dues pursuant to 18    paragraph (5) of subsection (d) of Section 8.19        (4) It has received funds from a TNC for the 20    administration of benefits and services to TNC drivers 21    pursuant to a sectoral agreement in its capacity as the 22    exclusive bargaining representative.23        (5) It has negotiated with a TNC, before or after 24    certification as the exclusive bargaining representative, 25    for the right and requisite resources to communicate or 26    meet with TNDs for any purpose permitted under this Act,   SB2906- 8 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1    including via the TNC's platform.2    "Covered transportation network company" and "covered TNC" 3means a transportation network company so designated pursuant 4to the following process:5        (1) In addition to the TND lists and information 6    required by the definition of "active transportation 7    network driver", within 90 days after the effective date 8    of this Act, within 2 weeks after the end of each calendar 9    quarter, each TNC shall electronically submit to the Board 10    a single statewide total of the rides performed during the 11    prior quarter by transportation network drivers on its 12    online-enabled application or platform. For purposes of 13    this definition, all digital networks or software 14    application services that any related corporate entities 15    under common control maintain shall be considered a single 16    TNC.17        (2) The information required by paragraph (1) of this 18    definition shall be produced in a manipulable electronic 19    format, such as a spreadsheet program consisting of cells 20    organized by lettered columns and numbered rows with each 21    data point in a separate cell that allows users to sort and 22    perform calculations and analysis. The Board may require 23    that the information be provided in a specified software 24    program.25        (3) Within 14 days after the deadline set forth in 26    paragraph (1) of this definition, the Board shall   SB2906- 9 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1    designate the covered TNCs through the following 2    procedure. The Board shall total all rides reported 3    pursuant to paragraph (1) of this definition. The Board 4    shall then rank all TNCs by rideshare volume in descending 5    order. The Board shall begin with the highest ranked TNC 6    and continue down the list until the Board has identified 7    the TNCs whose rides collectively equal or exceed 95% of 8    the statewide total for the preceding quarter. These TNCs 9    shall be deemed "covered TNCs" for purposes of this Act. 10    For purposes of this paragraph, all TNCs under common 11    ownership or control shall be considered to be a single 12    TNC. The Board shall then publish the list of covered TNCs 13    and noncovered TNCs and rideshare volume information on 14    its internet website. The Board shall notify each TNC as 15    to whether the TNC is a covered TNC.16        (4) The failure of a TNC to submit the list required by 17    paragraph (1) of this definition shall not prevent the 18    Board from providing a list of covered and noncovered TNCs 19    to the extent the Board concludes that the missing 20    information cannot reasonably be expected to change 21    whether those TNCs are covered or noncovered TNCs.22        (5) A TNC that was not a covered TNC when a sectoral 23    agreement took effect but whose rideshare volume in a 24    later quarter brings it within the 95% threshold 25    identified in paragraph (3) of this definition shall 26    become a covered TNC, and therefore bound by all terms of   SB2906- 10 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1    the sectoral agreement immediately.2        (6) A TNC that becomes a covered TNC pursuant to this 3    Section shall remain a covered TNC for the remaining term 4    of a sectoral agreement.5    "Department" means the Department of Labor.6    "Exclusive bargaining representative" means a TND 7organization certified by the Board, in accordance with this 8Act, as the representative of TNDs in a bargaining unit.9    "Mandatory subjects of bargaining" means those subjects of 10bargaining related to compensation, benefits, and other terms 11and conditions of work, including, but not limited to, 12deactivations, and dispute resolution procedures for resolving 13claims alleging unjust deactivation.14    "Person" includes one or more individuals, TNDs, TND 15organizations, TNCs, network companies, labor organizations, 16associations, corporations, legal representatives, trustees, 17trustees in bankruptcy, or receivers.18    "Transportation network company" and "TNC" means an entity 19operating in the State that uses a digital network or software 20application service to connect passengers to transportation 21network company services provided by transportation network 22drivers. For purposes of this paragraph, all digital networks 23or software application services that any related corporate 24entities under common control maintain shall be considered a 25single TNC. A TNC is not deemed to own, control, operate, or 26manage the vehicles used by transportation network drivers,   SB2906- 11 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1and is not a taxicab association or a for-hire vehicle owner.2    "Transportation network company services" and "TNC 3services" means transportation of a passenger between points 4chosen by the passenger and prearranged with a transportation 5network driver through the use of a TNC digital network or 6software application. "Transportation network company 7services" and "TNC services" do not include a taxicab, 8for-hire vehicle, or street hail service.9    "Transportation network driver", "transportation network 10company driver", "TNC driver", and "TND" means an individual 11who operates a motor vehicle that: (i) is owned, leased, or 12otherwise authorized for use by the individual; (ii) is not a 13taxicab or for-hire public passenger vehicle; (iii) is used to 14provide transportation network company services; and (iv) 15operates under the TNC license of the TNC. "Transportation 16network driver", "transportation network company driver", "TNC 17driver", and "TND" do not include any individual who, with 18respect to the provision of TNC services is: (i) determined by 19a final order of a court of competent jurisdiction to be an 20employee within the meaning of Section 2(3) of the National 21Labor Relations Act, 29 U.S.C. 152(3), or within the meaning 22of 26 CFR 31.3121(d)-1 or 31.3401(c)-1; or (ii) declared by a 23TNC to be an employee within the meaning of Section 2(3) of the 24National Labor Relations Act, 29 U.S.C. 152(3) and within the 25meaning of 26 CFR 31.3121(d)-1 or 31.3401(c)-1.26    "Transportation network driver organization" and "TND   SB2906- 12 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1organization" means any organization in which TNDs 2participate, and which exists and is constituted for the 3purpose, in whole or in part, of collective bargaining, or of 4dealing with transportation network companies concerning 5grievances, terms or conditions of work, or of other mutual 6aid or protection and which is not a company union as defined 7by this Act.8    "Unfair work practices" means only those unfair work 9practices set forth in Section 6. 10    Section 4. Powers of the Board. The Board shall have 11jurisdiction over unfair work practices and collective 12bargaining matters between transportation network companies 13and transportation network driver organizations, except for 14the determinations to be made by the Department under this 15Act.  16    Section 5. Rights of TNDs. Transportation network drivers 17shall have the right of self-organization, to form, join, or 18assist TND organizations, to bargain collectively through 19representatives of their own choosing, and to engage in 20concerted activities, for the purpose of collective bargaining 21or other mutual aid or protection, free from interference, 22restraint, or coercion by TNCs, and shall also have the right 23to refrain from any of these activities. Nothing contained in 24this Act shall be interpreted to prohibit TNDs from exercising   SB2906- 13 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1the right to confer with TNCs at any time, provided that during 2such conference there is no attempt by such TNC, directly or 3indirectly, to interfere with, restrain, or coerce such 4workers in the exercise of the rights guaranteed by this Act. 5    Section 6. Unfair work practices. 6    (a) It is an unfair work practice for a TNC to:7        (1) Fail or refuse to provide the Board or a TND 8    organization with an accurate list of the names, trips 9    made, and contact information for TNDs, as required by 10    this Act.11        (2) Fail or refuse to submit the list to the Board 12    required by the definition of "covered transportation 13    network company".14        (3) Fail or refuse to negotiate in good faith with a 15    TND organization certified as an exclusive bargaining 16    representative of TNDs engaged with such TNC, concerning 17    mandatory subjects of bargaining.18        (4) Fail or refuse to provide a TND organization, 19    certified as an exclusive bargaining representative of 20    TNDs engaged with such TNC, with information requested by 21    the TND organization that is relevant to, and necessary 22    for, purposes of bargaining and the performance of its 23    other duties required by this Act.24        (5) Fail or refuse to continue all the terms of a 25    determination of terms and conditions of work approved or   SB2906- 14 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1    prescribed by the Department pursuant to this Act until a 2    new determination is approved or prescribed, unless in 3    accordance with a recognized exception under the law.4        (6) Dominate or interfere with the formation, 5    existence, or administration of any TND organization, or 6    to contribute financial or other support to any such 7    organization, directly or indirectly, unless required by 8    this Act or by any rules implementing this Act, including, 9    but not limited to, the following:10            (i) by participating or assisting in, supervising, 11        or controlling (1) the initiation or creation of any 12        such organization or (2) the meetings, management, 13        operation, elections, formulation or amendment of 14        constitution, rules, or policies, of any such 15        organization;16            (ii) by offering incentives to TNDs to join any 17        such organization; or18            (iii) by donating free services, equipment, 19        materials, office or meeting space or anything else of 20        value for the use of any such organization; provided 21        that a TNC may permit TNDs to perform representational 22        work protected under this Act during working hours 23        without loss of time or pay or allow agents of a TND 24        organization that is the exclusive representative of 25        its TNDs to meet with TNDs on its premises or 26        communicate with TNDs via the TNC's platform.  SB2906- 15 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1        (7) Require a TND to join any company union or TND 2    organization or to require a TND to refrain from forming, 3    or joining or assisting a TND organization of their own 4    choosing.5        (8) Encourage membership in any company union or 6    discourage membership in any TND organization, by 7    discrimination in regard to any term or condition of work.8        (9) Deactivate or otherwise discriminate against a TND 9    because they have signed or filed any charge, affidavit, 10    petition, or complaint or given any information or 11    testimony under this Act.12        (10) Distribute or circulate any blacklist of 13    individuals exercising any right created or confirmed by 14    this Act or of members of a TND organization, or to inform 15    any person of the exercise by any individual of such right 16    or of the membership of any individual in a TND 17    organization for the purpose of preventing individuals so 18    blacklisted or so named from obtaining or retaining 19    opportunities for remuneration.20        (11) Perform any acts, other than those already 21    enumerated in this Section, which interfere with, 22    restrain, or coerce TNDs in the exercise of the rights 23    guaranteed by this Act.24    (b) It is an unfair work practice for a TND organization 25to:26        (1) Fail or refuse to negotiate in good faith with a   SB2906- 16 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1    TNC concerning mandatory subjects of bargaining, provided 2    that the TND organization is the certified exclusive 3    bargaining representative of the TNC's transportation 4    network drivers, including by refusing to provide 5    information requested by a TNC that is relevant and 6    necessary for purposes of bargaining and the performance 7    of its other duties required by this Act. 8        (2) Restrain or coerce TNDs in the exercise of the 9    rights guaranteed by this Act, provided that this 10    paragraph shall not impair the right of a TND organization 11    to prescribe its own rules with respect to the acquisition 12    or retention of membership in the organization.13        (3) Fail or refuse to fulfill its duty of fair 14    representation by intentional misconduct in representing 15    TNDs where it is the certified exclusive bargaining 16    representative. 17        (4) Restrain or coerce a TNC in the selection of its 18    representatives for the purpose of bargaining or the 19    adjustment of grievances.20        (5) Cause or attempt to cause an employer to 21    discriminate against an employee in violation of paragraph 22    (9) of subsection (a) of Section 6.23    (c) For purposes of this Section "to negotiate in good 24faith" means the performance of the mutual obligation of the 25transportation network companies or their agents or 26representatives and the exclusive bargaining representative to   SB2906- 17 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1meet at reasonable times and negotiate in good faith with 2respect to mandatory subjects of bargaining, or the 3negotiation of a sectoral agreement under Section 10, or any 4question arising thereunder, and to execute a written contract 5incorporating any agreement reached if requested by either 6party. However, this mutual obligation does not compel the 7transportation network companies or the exclusive bargaining 8representative to agree to a proposal or require the making of 9a concession. 10    Section 7. Prevention of unfair work practices. 11    (a) The Board is empowered and directed to prevent any TNC 12and any TND organization from engaging in any unfair work 13practice described in this Act. This power shall not be 14affected or impaired by any means of adjustment, mediation, or 15conciliation in labor disputes that have been or may hereafter 16be established by law or by the determination provided for in 17subsection (i) of Section 10. In order to prevent unfair work 18practices, each TNC shall, at least once each year, send a text 19message and an email to each of its active TNDs in a form 20determined by the Board notifying the TNDs of their rights 21under this Act, and the procedure for filing an unfair work 22practice charge. The TNC shall provide the notice in all 23languages that the Board determines are likely spoken by 5% or 24more of TNC drivers. The Board shall also post a copy of this 25notice on its website.   SB2906- 18 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1    (b) Unfair work practice charges shall be filed no later 2than 6 months after the date on which the charging party knew, 3or reasonably should have known, of the violation.4    (c) Whenever it is charged that any person has engaged in, 5or is engaging in, any unfair work practice, the Board, or any 6agent or agency designated by the Board for such purposes, 7shall conduct an investigation of the charge. If after such 8investigation the Board finds that the charge involves a 9dispositive issue of law or fact, the Board shall issue a 10complaint and cause to be served upon the person a complaint 11stating the charges, accompanied by a notice of hearing before 12the Board or a member thereof designated by the Board, or 13before a qualified hearing officer designated by the Board at 14the offices of the Board or such other location as the Board 15deems appropriate, not less than 5 days after serving of such 16complaint. Any such complaint may be amended by the member or 17hearing officer conducting the hearing for the Board in their 18discretion at any time prior to the issuance of an order based 19thereon. The person who is the subject of the complaint has the 20right to file an answer to the original or amended complaint 21and to appear in person or by a representative and give 22testimony at the place and time fixed in the complaint. In the 23discretion of the member or hearing officer conducting the 24hearing or the Board, any other person may be allowed to 25intervene in the proceeding and to present testimony. In any 26hearing conducted by the Board, neither the Board nor the   SB2906- 19 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1member or agent conducting the hearing shall be bound by the 2rules of evidence applicable to courts, except as to the rules 3of privilege recognized by law.4    (d) The Board shall have the power to issue subpoenas and 5administer oaths. If any party willfully fails or neglects to 6appear or testify or to produce books, papers, and records 7pursuant to the issuance of a subpoena by the Board, the Board 8may apply to a court of competent jurisdiction to request that 9such party be ordered to appear before the Board to testify or 10produce the requested evidence.11    (e) Any testimony taken by the Board, or a member 12designated by the Board or a hearing officer thereof, must be 13reduced to writing and filed with the Board. A full and 14complete record shall be kept of all proceedings before the 15Board, and all proceedings shall be transcribed by a reporter 16appointed by the Board. The party on whom the burden of proof 17rests shall be required to sustain such burden by a 18preponderance of the evidence, and the charging party shall 19have the burden of proving the unfair work practice 20accordingly. If, upon a preponderance of the evidence taken, 21the Board is of the opinion that any person named in the charge 22has engaged in or is engaging in an unfair work practice, then 23it shall state its findings of fact and shall issue and cause 24to be served upon the person an order requiring them to cease 25and desist from the unfair work practice, and to take such 26affirmative action as will effectuate the provisions of this   SB2906- 20 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1Act including, but not limited to: (i) withdrawal of 2recognition from and refraining from bargaining sectorally 3with any organization or association, agency, or plan that is 4either defined in this Act as a company union or established, 5maintained, or assisted by any action defined in this Act as an 6unfair work practice; (ii) awarding of back compensation 7without any reduction based on the TND's interim earnings or 8failure to earn interim earnings and, upon a showing of 9egregious misconduct, an additional amount as liquidated 10damages equal to 2 times the amount of back compensation 11awarded; (iii) requiring reengagement or reestablishment of 12the TNC's preexisting relationship with an improperly 13adversely affected TND with or without compensation, or 14maintenance of a preferential list from which such TND shall 15be reengaged or the relationship reestablished, and such order 16may further require such respondent to make reports from time 17to time showing the extent to which the order has been complied 18with; (iv) requiring the TNC to recognize and bargain with a 19TND organization if the Board determines that the unfair work 20practice interfered with the TND's right to form or join a TND 21organization; and (v) requiring the respondent to comply with 22any other obligation of this Act. The Board's order may in its 23discretion also include an appropriate sanction, based on the 24Board's rules, and the sanction may include an order to pay the 25other party or parties' reasonable expenses including costs 26and reasonable attorney's fees, if the other party has made   SB2906- 21 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1allegations or denials without reasonable cause and found to 2be untrue or has engaged in frivolous litigation for the 3purpose of delay or needless increase in the cost of 4litigation. If the Board awards back compensation, damages, or 5monetary sanction, it shall also award interest at the rate of 67% per annum. The Board's order may further require the person 7to make reports from time to time, and demonstrate the extent 8to which the person has complied with the order. If there is no 9preponderance of evidence to indicate to the Board that the 10person named in the charge has engaged in or is engaging in the 11unfair work practice, then the Board shall state its findings 12of fact and shall issue an order dismissing the complaint. 13    (f) Until the record in a case has been filed in court, the 14Board at any time, upon reasonable notice and in such manner as 15it deems proper, may modify or set aside, in whole or in part, 16any finding or order made or issued by it.17    (g) A charging party or any person aggrieved by a final 18order of the Board granting or denying in whole or in part the 19relief sought may apply for and obtain judicial review of an 20order of the Board entered under this Act, in accordance with 21the provisions of the Administrative Review Law, except that 22such judicial review shall be afforded directly in the 23Appellate Court for the district in which the aggrieved party 24resides or transacts business, and such judicial review shall 25not be available for the purpose of challenging a final order 26issued by the Board pursuant to Section 8 for which judicial   SB2906- 22 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1review has been petitioned pursuant to subsection (e) of 2Section 8. Any direct appeal to the Appellate Court shall be 3filed within 35 days after the date that a copy of the decision 4sought to be reviewed was served upon the party affected by the 5decision. The filing of such an appeal to the Appellate Court 6shall not automatically stay the enforcement of the Board's 7order. An aggrieved party may apply to the Appellate Court for 8a stay of the enforcement of the Board's order after the 9aggrieved party has followed the procedure prescribed by 10Supreme Court Rule 335. The Board in proceedings under this 11Section shall request and may obtain an order of the court for 12the enforcement of the Board's order.13    (h) Whenever it appears that any person has violated a 14final order of the Board issued pursuant to this Section, the 15Board must commence an action in the name of the People of the 16State of Illinois by petition, alleging the violation, 17attaching a copy of the order of the Board, and praying for the 18issuance of an order directing the person, the person's 19officers, agents, servants, successors, and assigns to comply 20with the order of the Board. The Board shall be represented in 21this action by the Attorney General in accordance with the 22Attorney General Act. The court may grant or refuse, in whole 23or in part, the relief sought, provided that the court may stay 24an order of the Board in accordance with the Administrative 25Review Law, pending disposition of the proceedings. The court 26may punish a violation of its order as in civil contempt. The   SB2906- 23 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1proceedings provided in this paragraph shall be commenced in 2the Appellate Court for the district where the unfair work 3practice which is the subject of the Board's order was 4committed, or where a person required to cease and desist by 5such order resides or transacts business. In case of the 6enforcement of an order of the Board, the Appellate Court 7shall have the power to issue any injunctive or equitable 8remedy it finds appropriate, and in the case of a Board order 9which requires the payment of money, the Appellate Court shall 10have the power to enter judgment for the amount justified by 11the record and for costs, which judgment may be enforced as 12other judgments for the recovery of money.13    (i)(1) A party filing an unfair work practice charge under 14this Section may petition the Board to obtain injunctive 15relief, pending a decision on the merits of the charge by the 16Board, a member thereof designated by the Board, or by a 17hearing officer designated by the Board, upon a showing that: 18(i) it is likely to succeed on the merits; (ii) it is likely to 19suffer irreparable harm in the absence of preliminary relief; 20(iii) the balance of equities tips in their favor; and (iv) an 21injunction is in the public interest. The immediate and 22irreparable harm may include the chilling of TNDs in the 23exercise of rights provided or protected by this Act.24    (2) Within 30 days after the receipt by the Board of such 25petition for injunctive relief, if the Board determines that a 26charging party has made a sufficient showing pursuant to   SB2906- 24 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1paragraph (1) the Board, through the Attorney General, shall 2petition the circuit court where the alleged unfair work 3practice was allegedly committed, or where a person required 4to cease and desist from such alleged unfair work practice 5resides or transacts business, for appropriate temporary 6relief or restraining order. If the Board fails to act within 710 days, the Board shall be deemed to have made a final order 8determining not to seek injunctive relief. If the Board 9determines not to seek injunctive relief, or if the Board or 10Attorney General do not petition the circuit court for such 11injunctive relief within 30 days after the filing of the 12charging party's petition with the Board, the charging party 13may seek injunctive relief by petition to the circuit court, 14in which case the Board must be joined as a necessary party. 15    (3) Upon the filing of any petition for injunctive relief 16as provided in the preceding paragraph, such injunctive relief 17may be granted by the court, after hearing all parties, if it 18determines that there is a sufficient showing under paragraph 19(1). The relief shall expire on decision by the Board, a member 20thereof designated by the Board, or a hearing officer 21designated by the Board finding no unfair work practice to 22have occurred, successful appeal of the grant of injunctive 23relief, or successful motion to vacate or modify such 24injunctive relief pursuant to the Code of Civil Procedure. Any 25injunctive relief in effect pending a decision by the Board 26(i) shall expire upon a decision by the Board finding no unfair   SB2906- 25 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1work practice to have occurred, of which the Board shall 2notify the court immediately, or (ii) shall remain in effect 3only to the extent it implements any remedial order issued by 4the Board in its decision, of which the Board shall notify the 5court immediately.6    (4) A decision on the merits of the unfair work practice 7charge by the Board finding an unfair work practice to have 8occurred shall continue the injunctive relief until either (i) 9the respondent implements the remedy, or (ii) the Board's 10order is set aside in an action for review of the Board's order 11pursuant to the Administrative Review Law as set forth in 12subsection (g).13    (5) The appeal of any order granting, denying, modifying, 14or vacating injunctive relief ordered by the court pursuant to 15this subsection shall be made in accordance with the Code of 16Civil Procedure and Supreme Court Rules.17    (6) The Board or, where applicable, the charging party, 18shall not be required to give any undertakings or bond and 19shall not be liable for any damages or costs which may have 20been sustained by reason of any injunctive relief ordered. In 21the case of a TNC's failure to provide an accurate list of 22names, mobile phone numbers, email addresses, and mailing 23addresses of TNDs, immediate and irreparable injury, loss, or 24damage shall be presumed.25    (j) In addition to, and without limiting, any other 26procedure provided in this Section, the Board is empowered and   SB2906- 26 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1directed to enforce, and prevent violations of paragraph (2) 2of subsection (a) of Section 6 as follows.3        (1) Upon the failure or refusal of a TNC to timely 4    submit the list to the Board required by the definition of 5    "covered transportation network company", the Board shall 6    promptly issue a complaint charging the TNC with an unfair 7    work practice and petition a court of competent 8    jurisdiction for temporary relief to compel production of 9    the list, consistent with the procedures in subsection 10    (i), except that the Board shall have a mandatory, 11    non-discretionary duty to seek such injunctive relief. In 12    the case of a TNC's failure to provide the list to the 13    Board required by the definition of "covered 14    transportation network company", immediate and irreparable 15    injury, loss, or damage shall be presumed.16        (2) In addition to any other remedy provided by this 17    Act, a TNC found to have committed an unfair work practice 18    in violation of paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of Section 19    6 shall be subject to a civil penalty, payable to the 20    Board, not to exceed $10,000 per day for each day after the 21    deadline that the list was not provided. The amount of the 22    penalty shall be determined by the Board through 23    application of the following criteria: (i) the size of the 24    TNC; (ii) the severity of the violation; and (iii) any 25    history of violations by the TNC. A TNC found to have 26    committed an unfair work practice in violation of   SB2906- 27 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1    paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of Section 6 shall also be 2    required by the Board to pay the Board's or charging 3    party's attorney's fees and costs for any court proceeding 4    initiated by the Board or charging party to compel 5    production of the list. 6    Section 8. Designation of bargaining representatives. 7    (a) For purposes of this Act, each TND performing TNC 8services on a covered TNC shall be included in an 9industry-wide bargaining unit of all TNDs in the State.10    (b) A TND organization may demonstrate that it has been 11designated as a bargaining representative by presenting to the 12Board cards, petitions, or other evidence, which may be in 13electronic form, sufficient to show the TND has authorized the 14TND organization to act as the worker's bargaining 15representative. A TND may demonstrate that TNDs do not wish to 16be represented by a TND organization by presenting to the 17Board cards, petitions, or other evidence, which may be in 18electronic form, sufficient to show the TND does not authorize 19any TND organization to act as the worker's exclusive 20bargaining representative. The Board shall deem valid any such 21card, petition, or other evidence that includes (i) the 22signature of the TND, (ii) the date of execution, (iii) a 23statement indicating the TND's authorization of the TND 24organization to act as the TND's exclusive bargaining 25representative or alternatively the TND's wish to not be   SB2906- 28 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1represented by a TND organization, and (iv) the name of at 2least one TNC for whom the TND performs services. In order to 3be valid, such card, petition, or other evidence must have 4been executed by the TND within one year of the date that the 5TND organization, or TND, submits the evidence to the Board. 6The authorizations or designations of representative may be 7evidenced by electronic records or electronic signatures as 8provided under Section 7 of the Uniform Electronic 9Transactions Act. The Board shall adopt rules for verification 10of electronic signatures that are comparable to the standards 11set forth in Section III of the National Labor Relations Board 12Office of the General Counsel Memo 15-08.13    (c)(1) Within 30 days after the petition of any TND 14organization, the Board shall make a determination that such 15organization has been designated as bargaining representative 16by at least 10% of active TNDs in the bargaining unit. For 17purposes of this provision, the operative list of active TNDs 18shall be based on the most recent quarterly list provided by 19the covered TNCs to the Board in accordance with the 20definition of "active transportation network driver".21    (2) Within 30 days after the Board's determination that a 22TND organization has been designated as the bargaining 23representative of at least 10% of active TNDs in the 24bargaining unit, the Board shall: (i) require each covered TNC 25to send a notice, in a form determined by the Board, that the 26TND organization is seeking to represent TNDs for the purpose   SB2906- 29 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1of initiating a bargaining process in order to establish terms 2and conditions for the industry; and (ii) provide the TND 3organization with a complete list of names, phone numbers, 4mailing address, and email addresses for all active TNDs in 5the bargaining unit. The TNC shall provide the notice in all 6languages that the Board determines are likely spoken by 5% or 7more of TNC drivers. The Board will provide the TND 8organization with an updated list each quarter for the 9following 4 quarters. For 6 months from the date of the Board's 10determination that a TND organization has met the 10% 11threshold in a bargaining unit, and where such TND 12organization is the first TND organization to meet such 13threshold, no other TND organization may be certified as the 14exclusive bargaining representative of those workers without 15an election.16    (d)(1) A TND organization that provides evidence to the 17Board that it has been designated as bargaining representative 18by 30% of active TNDs in the bargaining unit shall be certified 19as the exclusive bargaining representative of all TNDs in the 20bargaining unit. The Board shall make such determination of 21exclusive bargaining representative status within 30 days 22after the petition. In the alternative, a TND organization 23that has been designated as the bargaining representative of 24at least 10% of active TNDs in the bargaining unit, pursuant to 25a petition filed under subsections (c) or (d), may petition 26the Board to conduct an election. The TND may petition for such   SB2906- 30 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1election at any time within one year of the Board's 2determination that it has been designated as the bargaining 3representative of at least 10% of active TNDs. The election 4shall be conducted as expeditiously as possible, but in no 5event more than 60 days after the TND organization's petition 6for election. If the TND organization receives a majority of 7valid votes cast in such election, the Board shall certify the 8TND organization as the exclusive bargaining representative. 9For purposes of this provision, the operative list of active 10TNDs shall be based on the most recent quarterly list provided 11by the covered TNCs in accordance with the definition of 12"active transportation network driver".13    (2) If a TND organization seeking certification as the 14exclusive bargaining representative without an election 15provides evidence that shows that less than a majority of 16active TNDs have designated the TND organization as their 17bargaining representative, the Board shall wait 7 days before 18certifying the TND organization as exclusive bargaining 19representative. If, during those 7 days, another TND 20organization provides evidence that at least 20% of active 21TNDs in the bargaining unit have designated it as their 22bargaining representative, then the Board shall hold an 23election among all active TNDs in the bargaining unit. Such 24election shall be conducted as expeditiously as possible, but 25in no event more than 60 days after the petition of the 26original TND seeking certification as exclusive bargaining   SB2906- 31 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1representative. For purposes of such an election, the 2operative list of active TNDs shall be based on the most recent 3quarterly list provided by the covered TNCs in accordance with 4the definition of "active transportation network driver". A 5TND organization receiving a majority of the valid votes cast 6shall be certified as the exclusive bargaining representative 7of all TNDs in the bargaining unit. When 2 or more TND 8organizations are on the ballot and none of the choices (the 9TND organizations or "no worker organization") receives a 10majority of the valid votes cast, there shall be a run-off 11election between the 2 choices receiving the largest and 12second largest number of votes, to be conducted within 45 days 13after the determination that no choice had received a majority 14of valid votes cast. The TNDs eligible to vote in the run-off 15election shall be the same TNDs eligible to vote in the initial 16election. A TND organization receiving a majority of the valid 17votes cast in the run-off election shall be certified as the 18exclusive bargaining representative of all TNDs in the 19bargaining unit. If a majority of the valid votes cast are for 20"no worker organization", then the Board will not certify any 21worker organization as the exclusive bargaining 22representative. 23    (3) A TND organization certified as the exclusive 24bargaining representative shall have the exclusive authority 25to represent the TNDs in the bargaining unit, without 26challenge by another TND organization, and not subject to   SB2906- 32 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1decertification by the procedures in this subsection, for the 2greater of (i) one year following certification, or (ii) the 3length of time that a final determination rendered by the 4Department under subsection (i) of Section 10 is in effect, 5provided that such period shall not be longer than 3 years 6following the date of issuance of such final determination. 7During the times when an exclusive bargaining representative 8is subject to challenge, TNDs may file for a decertification 9election upon a showing that at least 25% of the active TNDs in 10the bargaining unit have demonstrated support for the 11decertification. The Board will then schedule an election to 12determine whether the TND organization has retained its status 13as exclusive bargaining representative. The TND organization 14shall retain its status as exclusive bargaining representative 15if it receives a majority of valid votes cast by active TNDs in 16the bargaining unit. For purposes of this provision, the 17operative list of active TNDs shall be based on the most recent 18quarterly list provided by the covered TNCs in accordance with 19the definition of "active transportation network driver".20    (4) If a TND organization has been certified as the 21exclusive bargaining representative with respect to the 22bargaining unit, only that TND organization shall be entitled 23to: (i) immediately upon certification, and, quarterly 24thereafter, receive from the Board the data provided by the 25covered TNCs to the Board pursuant to the definition of 26"active transportation network driver", to be used solely for   SB2906- 33 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1the purposes of bargaining and the performance of its other 2duties as the TNDs bargaining representative; and (ii) to 3engage in bargaining with the covered TNCs for a sectoral 4agreement to be recommended to the Department concerning 5mandatory subjects of bargaining. 6    (5) A TND organization that has been certified as the 7exclusive bargaining representative with respect to the 8bargaining unit shall have a right to voluntary deduction of 9dues, initiation fees, assessments, and other payments to the 10TND organization, from payments to TNDs by a covered TNC, upon 11presentation of deduction authorizations signed by individual 12TNDs, which may be in electronic form. A covered TNC shall 13commence making such deductions in accordance with the terms 14of the deduction authorization as soon as practicable, but in 15no case later than 30 days after receiving proof of a signed 16deduction authorization, and amounts deducted shall be 17submitted to the TND organization within 30 days after the 18deduction. A covered TNC shall accept a signed deduction 19authorization evidenced by electronic records or electronic 20signatures as provided under Section 7 of the Uniform 21Electronic Transactions Act. The right to such deductions 22shall remain in full force and effect until an individual TND 23revokes the deduction authorization in writing in accordance 24with the terms of the authorization.25    (e) An order of the Board dismissing a representation 26petition or determining, certifying, or decertifying a TND   SB2906- 34 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1organization as an exclusive bargaining representative is a 2final order. Any person aggrieved by any such final order may 3apply for and obtain judicial review in accordance with the 4provisions of the Administrative Review Law, except that such 5review shall be afforded directly in the Appellate Court for 6the district in which the aggrieved party resides or transacts 7business. Any direct appeal to the Appellate Court shall be 8filed within 35 days after the date that a copy of the decision 9sought to be reviewed was served upon the party affected by the 10decision.11    (f) Upon agreement by a TND organization seeking such 12determination or petition or a TND seeking such determination, 13and the relevant covered TNC or TNCs, any of the numerical 14thresholds or any of the elections in this Section shall be 15determined or conducted by a neutral body, in accordance with 16the provisions of this Act. The fees of the neutral body shall 17be paid by the Board. The neutral body shall report the results 18of such determination or election to the Board, which shall 19certify the results so long as it is satisfied that the 20determination was made or election was conducted in accordance 21with the provisions of this Act. If no neutral body has been 22agreed to within 10 days after a TND organization's or TND's 23notice of its request for a determination or its petition, the 24Board may designate a neutral body or perform such functions 25itself.   SB2906- 35 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1    Section 9. Administrative fees. 2    (a) Beginning on the date that a TND organization is 3certified as the exclusive bargaining representative, each 4covered TNC shall impose a fee of 20 cents per trip, which the 5Board shall collect. The Board shall use such fees to issue 6grants to the exclusive bargaining representative to educate 7TNDs regarding their rights under this Act, to provide 8assistance in enforcing those rights, and to enforce the terms 9of an agreement or determination approved by the Department 10under this Act.11    (b) The fee shall be 20 cents per ride on each trip 12originating in the State performed by a TND. Beginning on the 13first January 1st after a TND organization has been certified 14as an exclusive bargaining representative for at least 12 15months, and each January 1st thereafter, the fee shall be 16adjusted to the nearest penny to reflect any increase in 17inflation as measured by the Consumer Price Index for All 18Urban Consumers published by the United States Bureau of Labor 19Statistics. The Board shall calculate and publish the 20adjustments required by this subsection.21    (c) The fee shall be displayed to customers as a "Labor 22Relations Administrative Fee".23    (d) The Board shall adopt by rule an exclusive bargaining 24representative grant application and criteria for evaluating 25such grant applications, including criteria to ensure that the 26exclusive bargaining representative has the capacity and   SB2906- 36 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1expertise to provide education and enforcement support to 2TNDs. If the exclusive bargaining representative meets the 3criteria established by the Board, the Board shall approve the 4grant application and remit the fees to the exclusive 5bargaining representative on a monthly basis, with each 6payment occurring no more than 30 days following the end of the 7month. The fees shall be used by the TND organization solely to 8educate TNDs regarding the rights protected by this Act, to 9provide assistance in enforcing those rights, to negotiate the 10sectoral agreement as provided in this Act, and to enforce the 11terms of any agreement or determination approved by the 12Department under this Act. No portion of such fees shall be 13used for political contributions or lobbying. If no such grant 14is awarded or if the fees collected exceed the grant awarded, 15the Board shall use such fees for educational or enforcement 16activities regarding the provisions of this Act.17    (e) Each exclusive bargaining representative shall submit 18an annual report to the Board in a form to be determined by the 19Board setting forth how the fees have been utilized. The Board 20shall review each annual report and certify whether the 21exclusive bargaining representative is utilizing the fees for 22appropriate activities and continues to meet the grant 23application criteria. The Board shall adopt rules to establish 24a process by which it may suspend or revoke grants based on the 25failure to utilize the fees for educational or enforcement 26activities or the failure to meet the grant application   SB2906- 37 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1criteria. If the Board finds that the exclusive bargaining 2representative does not meet the grant application criteria, 3the Board may utilize the fees for its own educational and 4enforcement activities, and the exclusive bargaining 5representative may reapply for a grant in the following year. 6    Section 10. Bargaining, impasse resolution procedures, and 7final determination by the Department. 8    (a) Once the Board certifies that a TND organization is 9the exclusive bargaining representative for the bargaining 10unit, the Board shall notify all covered TNCs, and all covered 11TNCs shall be required to bargain with the exclusive 12bargaining representative concerning mandatory subjects of 13bargaining. The covered TNCs and TND organization may bargain 14concerning other subjects agreed to by the parties. To 15facilitate negotiations, the covered TNCs may form an industry 16association to negotiate on their behalf. If the covered TNCs 17choose not to form an association, any recommended agreement 18must be approved by (i) at least 2 industry member covered TNCs 19and (ii) member covered TNCs representing at least 80% of the 20market share of that industry in the State, with votes 21determined in proportion to the number of rides completed by 22TNDs contracting directly with the covered TNC in the 2 23calendar quarters preceding the certification of the exclusive 24bargaining representative. 25    (b) Each individual covered TNC shall retain exclusive   SB2906- 38 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1control over the development, maintenance, design, pricing, 2and implementation of its product and product features, 3software, contract terms, algorithm, and operations and areas 4of service.5    (c) A sectoral agreement submitted to the Department for 6approval pursuant to subsection (i) shall address, at minimum, 7the following subjects, each of which must be set forth 8separately in the sectoral agreement, unless a subject is 9expressly waived by mutual agreement of the exclusive 10bargaining representative and the covered TNCs:11        (1) Compensation.12        (2) Benefits.13        (3) Appeals process for deactivations.14        (4) Representation of TNC drivers in deactivation 15    appeals.16        (5) Paid leave.17        (6) Information disclosed to TNC drivers about trips 18    on per-trip, weekly, and monthly earnings receipts and 19    summaries, and on initial ride offers.20        (7) Grievance and arbitration procedures to resolve 21    disputes arising under the sectoral agreement.22        (8) Safety mandates imposed by the covered TNCs that 23    require TNC drivers to purchase safety equipment or 24    purchase safety software, and safety features or protocols 25    proposed by the exclusive bargaining representative that 26    have a demonstrable purpose of reducing the risk of   SB2906- 39 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1    physical assault or injury to TNC drivers. For the 2    purposes of this paragraph, "purchase" includes an 3    automatic withdrawal from TNC driver earnings.4        (9) Labor-TNC partnerships.5        (10) Reasonable access by the exclusive bargaining 6    representative to covered TNC-to-TNC driver communication 7    systems.8        (11) Deduction of voluntary fees and dues from 9    payments to TNC drivers.10        (12) Duration of the sectoral agreement, which shall 11    be between 3 and 5 years.12        (13) Insurance coverage for occupational accidents or 13    injuries.14        (14) Compensation or supplemental insurance for job 15    loss.16    (d) A sectoral agreement, including an agreement 17recommended by an arbitrator pursuant to paragraph (6) of 18subsection (h), shall not contain a provision that prevents an 19individual covered TNC from exercising its autonomy pursuant 20to subsection (b).21    (e) The negotiated sectoral agreement shall be submitted 22by the TND organization to a vote by all TNDs who have 23completed at least 100 trips in the previous calendar quarter. 24Such vote shall be conducted by the TND organization pursuant 25to procedures determined at the discretion of the TND 26organization. If approved by a majority of TNDs who vote, the   SB2906- 40 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1sectoral agreement shall be submitted to the Department for 2approval. If a majority of valid votes cast by the TNDs are not 3in favor of the sectoral agreement, the TND organization and 4the covered TNCs will resume negotiating.5    (f) For purposes of this Section, an impasse may be deemed 6to exist if the covered TNCs and exclusive bargaining 7representative fail to achieve agreement by the end of a 8210-day period from the date a TND organization has been 9certified as the exclusive bargaining representative. In the 10case of bargaining for a successor sectoral agreement, an 11impasse may be deemed to exist if the covered TNCs and 12exclusive bargaining representative fail to achieve agreement 13by the end of a 60-day period preceding the expiration date of 14a prior determination by the Department as provided for in 15subsection (i).16    (g) Upon impasse, any of the affected covered TNCs or the 17exclusive bargaining representative may request the Board to 18render assistance as provided in this Section.19    (h) Upon receiving a timely request from an exclusive 20bargaining representative or covered TNC for commencement of 21an impasse proceeding, the Board shall aid the parties as 22follows:23        (1) To assist the parties to effect a voluntary 24    resolution of the dispute, the Board shall provide the 25    parties with a list of qualified mediators as maintained 26    by the Board within 7 days after the request for   SB2906- 41 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1    commencement of impasse proceedings. Within 7 days after 2    receipt of such list, the parties shall either select a 3    mediator from the Board's list or select another mutually 4    agreed mediator. If the parties fail to select a mediator 5    and notify the Board of their selection, within 7 days 6    after the date the Board provided the list of mediators, 7    the Board shall appoint a mediator from the list. The 8    Board shall make such an appointment and notify the 9    parties within 7 days. If the mediator is unable to 10    achieve agreement between the parties concerning an 11    appropriate resolution within 60 days after the Board has 12    provided the parties the list of mediators, any party may 13    petition the Board to refer the dispute to an arbitrator.14        (2) Upon timely petition of either party, the Board 15    shall refer the dispute to an arbitrator as provided.16        (3) Each of the affected parties (affected covered 17    TNCs and the exclusive bargaining representative) shall 18    have an equal say in the selection of the arbitrator and 19    each of the affected parties shall share equally the cost 20    of the arbitrator. If the parties are unable to agree upon 21    the arbitrator within 7 days after the Board notifies the 22    covered TNCs of the need to appoint an arbitrator, the 23    Board shall submit to the parties a list of qualified, 24    disinterested persons for the selection of an arbitrator. 25    A representative of each of the parties shall alternately 26    strike from the list one of the names with the order of   SB2906- 42 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1    striking determined by lot, until the remaining one person 2    shall be designated as the arbitrator. Each party shall 3    select its representative for this purpose as it sees fit. 4    A party's failure to agree upon the designation of its 5    representative shall result in the failure of the striking 6    procedure, but shall not impede the Board's appointment of 7    the arbitrator upon such failure. The striking process 8    shall be completed within 5 days after receipt of the 9    Board's list. The representatives who undertake the 10    striking shall notify the Board of the designated 11    arbitrator. If the parties are unable to select the 12    arbitrator within 5 days following receipt of this list, 13    the Board shall appoint the arbitrator.14        (4) The arbitrator shall hold hearings on all matters 15    related to the dispute, concerning mandatory subjects of 16    bargaining, and any other subject agreed to be submitted 17    by the covered TNCs and the TND organization. The parties 18    may be heard either in person, by counsel, or by other 19    representatives, as they may respectively designate. The 20    arbitrator shall determine the order of presentation by 21    the parties, and shall have discretion and authority to 22    decide all procedural issues that may be raised.23        (5) The parties may present, either orally or in 24    writing, or both, statements of fact, supporting witnesses 25    and other evidence, and argument of their respective 26    positions with respect to each case. The arbitrator shall   SB2906- 43 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1    have authority to require the production of such 2    additional evidence, either oral or written as they may 3    desire from the parties and shall provide at the request 4    of either party that a full and complete record be kept of 5    any such hearings, the cost of such record to be borne by 6    the requesting party. If such a record is created, it 7    shall be shared with all parties regardless of which party 8    paid for it.9        (6) The arbitrator shall make a just and reasonable 10    determination of the matters in dispute, set forth in 11    paragraph (4) of subsection (h), and within 90 days after 12    the arbitrator's appointment shall issue a determination 13    that shall apply to all covered TNCs and the exclusive 14    bargaining representative. The time period for the 15    arbitrator's determination may be extended by the 16    arbitrator upon good cause shown, or by agreement by the 17    parties. In arriving at such determination, the arbitrator 18    shall specify the basis for their findings, taking into 19    consideration, in addition to any factors recommended by 20    the parties that the arbitrator finds to be consistent 21    with this Act, the following:22            (i) whether the compensation, benefits, and 23        conditions of work of the TNDs achieve the policy 24        goals set forth in Section 2; such compensation and 25        benefits must take into account the real cost of 26        living, and may substantially exceed any statutory   SB2906- 44 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1        minimum wage, and should be a sufficient amount such 2        that the TNDs do not need to rely upon any public 3        benefits;4            (ii) whether the most efficient way to provide 5        benefits is through a portable benefits fund, and if 6        so, how to best assess each covered TNC a portion of 7        the costs of providing those benefits;8            (iii) the financial ability of the affected 9        covered TNCs to pay for the compensation and benefits 10        in question and the impact on the delivery of services 11        provided by the covered TNCs;12            (iv) the establishment of a reasonable 13        deactivation appeals process that will allow TNDs a 14        reasonable expectation of uninterrupted work; and15            (v) comparison of particularities in regard to 16        other trades or professions, including specifically, 17        hazards of work, physical qualifications, educational 18        qualifications, mental qualifications, job training, 19        and skills.20    (i) Any sectoral agreement, whether agreed upon between 21covered TNCs and a TND organization acting as exclusive 22bargaining representative of TNDs in the bargaining unit or as 23determined by an arbitrator, under this Act shall be reviewed 24and approved or disapproved by the Department. In deciding 25whether to grant approval to such sectoral agreement, the 26Department's decision shall be based on the factors specified   SB2906- 45 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1in paragraph (6) of subsection (h), and the policies set forth 2in Section 2. In deciding whether to approve such sectoral 3agreement, the Department shall afford the exclusive 4representative, all covered TNCs, and TNDs no more than 30 5days to submit comments and arguments concerning whether 6approval is warranted. Within 60 days after the deadline for 7submitting comments, the Department shall approve or 8disapprove the sectoral agreement. In the event of 9disapproval, the Department may make recommendations for 10amendments to the sectoral agreement that would cause the 11Department to approve and afford the parties an opportunity to 12respond to those recommendations. If during the period of time 13the sectoral agreement is in effect, the Department determines 14that market conditions have changed, the Department shall give 15the exclusive bargaining representative, all covered TNCs, and 16TNDs the opportunity to submit comments and arguments 17concerning whether the final determination should be modified, 18and after receiving those comments, the Department may modify 19the final determination. Any new terms for the bargaining unit 20shall be set in accordance with the procedures set forth in 21this Section.22    (j) A final determination by the Department under this 23Section is a final order. Any covered TNC or exclusive 24bargaining representative aggrieved by any such final order 25may apply for and obtain judicial review in accordance with 26the provisions of the Administrative Review Law, except that   SB2906- 46 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1such review shall be afforded directly in the Appellate Court 2for the district in which the aggrieved party resides or 3transacts business, and provided that such final orders of the 4Department shall only be overturned if found to be an abuse of 5discretion. Any direct appeal to the Appellate Court shall be 6filed within 35 days after the date that a copy of the decision 7sought to be reviewed was served upon the party affected by the 8decision. Except in a proceeding brought to review a final 9order of the Department, the determination of an arbitrator 10under this Section shall not be subject to judicial review. 11    Section 11. Applicability of other labor standards. No 12sectoral agreement, arbitrator's determination, or final 13determination by the Department made pursuant to this Act 14shall diminish or erode any minimum labor standard that would 15otherwise apply to a TND. 16    Section 12. Rulemaking. 17    (a) The Board and the Department shall make such rules as 18may be appropriate to effectuate the purposes and provisions 19of this Act. In order to provide for the expeditious and timely 20implementation of the provisions of this Act, such rules may 21be adopted by the Board or the Department as emergency rules 22pursuant to Section 5-45 of the Illinois Administrative 23Procedure Act within 6 months of the effective date of this 24Act. The adoption of those emergency rules shall be considered   SB2906- 47 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1an emergency and necessary for the public interest, safety, 2and welfare.3    (b) The Board may apply, in its discretion, applicable 4rules adopted under the Illinois Public Labor Relations Act to 5the extent those procedures are not inconsistent with the 6procedures specified in this Act. To effect that purpose, the 7Board may, in its discretion, and to the extent doing so is not 8inconsistent with the procedures specified in this Act, 9interpret rules adopted under the Illinois Public Labor 10Relations Act, referencing "employer" to include a 11transportation network company, referencing "employee" to 12include a transportation network driver, and referencing a 13"labor organization" to include a transportation network 14driver organization. 15    (c) The rules shall establish the obligations and 16procedures for the Board and TND organizations to protect TND 17data from public disclosure and unauthorized use, including: 18(i) minimization of data collected to what is necessary under 19this Act; (ii) encryption standards adhering to recognized 20security protocols; (iii) access controls to ensure that only 21authorized persons can view or process driver data; (iv) data 22retention policy; (v) auditing and compliance monitoring; (vi) 23data breach protocol; (vii) driver notification of data 24sharing; (viii) driver consent and driver opt-out of data 25sharing; and (ix) limitations on data use; (x) limiting the 26disclosure of driver personal identifying information to the   SB2906- 48 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1confidential uses necessary to effectuate this Act and not for 2the purpose of enforcing federal immigration law or providing 3it to an agency that primarily enforces immigration law, 4unless the Board is provided with a lawful court order or 5judicial warrant signed by a judge appointed pursuant to 6Article III of the United States Constitution, a federal grand 7jury or trial subpoena, or as otherwise required by federal 8law. 9    Section 13. Public records. Any record furnished to the 10Board, Department, or other state agency by a TNC pursuant to 11this Act including, but not limited to, TND records, shall not 12be considered a public record as defined in subsection (c) of 13Section 2 of the Freedom of Information Act. Such records are 14confidential and shall not be disclosed by the Board or any 15persons who may be authorized by the Board to process them 16solely for the purposes of this Act.  17    Section 900. The Illinois Administrative Procedure Act is 18amended by adding Section 5-45.71 as follows: 19    (5 ILCS 100/5-45.71 new)20    Sec. 5-45.71. Emergency rulemaking; Transportation Network 21Driver Labor Relations Act. To provide for the expeditious and 22timely implementation of the Transportation Network Driver 23Labor Relations Act, emergency rules implementing the   SB2906- 49 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1Transportation Network Driver Labor Relations Act may be 2adopted in accordance with Section 5-45 by the Illinois Labor 3Relations Board or the Department of Labor. The adoption of 4emergency rules authorized by Section 5-45 and this Section is 5deemed to be necessary for the public interest, safety, and 6welfare.7    This Section is repealed one year after the effective date 8of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. 9    Section 905. The Freedom of Information Act is amended by 10changing Section 7.5 as follows: 11    (5 ILCS 140/7.5)12    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-441 and 13104-457)14    Sec. 7.5. Statutory exemptions. To the extent provided for 15by the statutes referenced below, the following shall be 16exempt from inspection and copying:17        (a) All information determined to be confidential 18    under Section 4002 of the Technology Advancement and 19    Development Act.20        (b) Library circulation and order records identifying 21    library users with specific materials under the Library 22    Records Confidentiality Act.23        (c) Applications, related documents, and medical 24    records received by the Experimental Organ Transplantation   SB2906- 50 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1    Procedures Board and any and all documents or other 2    records prepared by the Experimental Organ Transplantation 3    Procedures Board or its staff relating to applications it 4    has received.5        (d) Information and records held by the Department of 6    Public Health and its authorized representatives relating 7    to known or suspected cases of sexually transmitted 8    infection or any information the disclosure of which is 9    restricted under the Illinois Sexually Transmitted 10    Infection Control Act.11        (e) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 12    under Section 30 of the Radon Industry Licensing Act.13        (f) Firm performance evaluations under Section 55 of 14    the Architectural, Engineering, and Land Surveying 15    Qualifications Based Selection Act.16        (g) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 17    and exempted under Section 50 of the Illinois Prepaid 18    Tuition Act.19        (h) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 20    under the State Officials and Employees Ethics Act, and 21    records of any lawfully created State or local inspector 22    general's office that would be exempt if created or 23    obtained by an Executive Inspector General's office under 24    that Act.25        (i) Information contained in a local emergency energy 26    plan submitted to a municipality in accordance with a   SB2906- 51 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1    local emergency energy plan ordinance that is adopted 2    under Section 11-21.5-5 of the Illinois Municipal Code.3        (j) Information and data concerning the distribution 4    of surcharge moneys collected and remitted by carriers 5    under the Emergency Telephone System Act.6        (k) Law enforcement officer identification information 7    or driver identification information compiled by a law 8    enforcement agency or the Department of Transportation 9    under Section 11-212 of the Illinois Vehicle Code.10        (l) Records and information provided to a residential 11    health care facility resident sexual assault and death 12    review team or the Executive Council under the Abuse 13    Prevention Review Team Act.14        (m) Information provided to the predatory lending 15    database created pursuant to Article 3 of the Residential 16    Real Property Disclosure Act, except to the extent 17    authorized under that Article.18        (n) Defense budgets and petitions for certification of 19    compensation and expenses for court appointed trial 20    counsel as provided under Sections 10 and 15 of the 21    Capital Crimes Litigation Act (repealed). This subsection 22    (n) shall apply until the conclusion of the trial of the 23    case, even if the prosecution chooses not to pursue the 24    death penalty prior to trial or sentencing.25        (o) Information that is prohibited from being 26    disclosed under Section 4 of the Illinois Health and   SB2906- 52 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1    Hazardous Substances Registry Act.2        (p) Security portions of system safety program plans, 3    investigation reports, surveys, schedules, lists, data, or 4    information compiled, collected, or prepared by or for the 5    Department of Transportation under Sections 2705-300 and 6    2705-616 of the Department of Transportation Law of the 7    Civil Administrative Code of Illinois, the Regional 8    Transportation Authority under Section 2.11 of the 9    Regional Transportation Authority Act, or the St. Clair 10    County Transit District under the Bi-State Transit Safety 11    Act (repealed). 12        (q) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the 13    Personnel Record Review Act. 14        (r) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the 15    Illinois School Student Records Act. 16        (s) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 17    under Section 5-108 of the Public Utilities Act. 18        (t) (Blank). 19        (u) Records and information provided to an independent 20    team of experts under the Developmental Disability and 21    Mental Health Safety Act (also known as Brian's Law). 22        (v) Names and information of people who have applied 23    for or received Firearm Owner's Identification Cards under 24    the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act or applied for 25    or received a concealed carry license under the Firearm 26    Concealed Carry Act, unless otherwise authorized by the   SB2906- 53 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1    Firearm Concealed Carry Act; and databases under the 2    Firearm Concealed Carry Act, records of the Concealed 3    Carry Licensing Review Board under the Firearm Concealed 4    Carry Act, and law enforcement agency objections under the 5    Firearm Concealed Carry Act. 6        (v-5) Records of the Firearm Owner's Identification 7    Card Review Board that are exempted from disclosure under 8    Section 10 of the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act.9        (w) Personally identifiable information which is 10    exempted from disclosure under subsection (g) of Section 11    19.1 of the Toll Highway Act.12        (x) Information which is exempted from disclosure 13    under Section 5-1014.3 of the Counties Code or Section 14    8-11-21 of the Illinois Municipal Code. 15        (y) Confidential information under the Adult 16    Protective Services Act and its predecessor enabling 17    statute, the Elder Abuse and Neglect Act, including 18    information about the identity and administrative finding 19    against any caregiver of a verified and substantiated 20    decision of abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation of 21    an eligible adult maintained in the Registry established 22    under Section 7.5 of the Adult Protective Services Act. 23        (z) Records and information provided to a fatality 24    review team or the Illinois Fatality Review Team Advisory 25    Council under Section 15 of the Adult Protective Services 26    Act.   SB2906- 54 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1        (aa) Information which is exempted from disclosure 2    under Section 2.37 of the Wildlife Code. 3        (bb) Information which is or was prohibited from 4    disclosure by the Juvenile Court Act of 1987. 5        (cc) Recordings made under the Law Enforcement 6    Officer-Worn Body Camera Act, except to the extent 7    authorized under that Act.8        (dd) Information that is prohibited from being 9    disclosed under Section 45 of the Condominium and Common 10    Interest Community Ombudsperson Act. 11        (ee) Information that is exempted from disclosure 12    under Section 30.1 of the Pharmacy Practice Act. 13        (ff) Information that is exempted from disclosure 14    under the Revised Uniform Unclaimed Property Act. 15        (gg) Information that is prohibited from being 16    disclosed under Section 7-603.5 of the Illinois Vehicle 17    Code. 18        (hh) Records that are exempt from disclosure under 19    Section 1A-16.7 of the Election Code. 20        (ii) Information which is exempted from disclosure 21    under Section 2505-800 of the Department of Revenue Law of 22    the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 23        (jj) Information and reports that are required to be 24    submitted to the Department of Labor by registering day 25    and temporary labor service agencies but are exempt from 26    disclosure under subsection (a-1) of Section 45 of the Day   SB2906- 55 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1    and Temporary Labor Services Act. 2        (kk) Information prohibited from disclosure under the 3    Seizure and Forfeiture Reporting Act. 4        (ll) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 5    and exempted under Section 5-30.8 of the Illinois Public 6    Aid Code. 7        (mm) Records that are exempt from disclosure under 8    Section 4.2 of the Crime Victims Compensation Act. 9        (nn) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 10    Section 70 of the Higher Education Student Assistance Act. 11        (oo) Communications, notes, records, and reports 12    arising out of a peer support counseling session 13    prohibited from disclosure under the First Responders 14    Suicide Prevention Act. 15        (pp) Names and all identifying information relating to 16    an employee of an emergency services provider or law 17    enforcement agency under the First Responders Suicide 18    Prevention Act. 19        (qq) Information and records held by the Department of 20    Public Health and its authorized representatives collected 21    under the Reproductive Health Act. 22        (rr) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 23    the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act. 24        (ss) Data reported by an employer to the Department of 25    Human Rights pursuant to Section 2-108 of the Illinois 26    Human Rights Act.  SB2906- 56 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1        (tt) Recordings made under the Children's Advocacy 2    Center Act, except to the extent authorized under that 3    Act. 4        (uu) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 5    Section 50 of the Sexual Assault Evidence Submission Act. 6        (vv) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 7    subsections (f) and (j) of Section 5-36 of the Illinois 8    Public Aid Code. 9        (ww) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 10    Section 16.8 of the State Treasurer Act. 11        (xx) Information that is exempt from disclosure or 12    information that shall not be made public under the 13    Illinois Insurance Code. 14        (yy) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 15    the Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act.16        (zz) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 17    the Illinois Public Labor Relations Act. 18        (aaa) Information prohibited from being disclosed 19    under Section 1-167 of the Illinois Pension Code. 20        (bbb) Information that is prohibited from disclosure 21    by the Illinois Police Training Act and the Illinois State 22    Police Act. 23        (ccc) Records exempt from disclosure under Section 24    2605-304 of the Illinois State Police Law of the Civil 25    Administrative Code of Illinois. 26        (ddd) Information prohibited from being disclosed   SB2906- 57 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1    under Section 35 of the Address Confidentiality for 2    Victims of Domestic Violence, Sexual Assault, Human 3    Trafficking, or Stalking Act. 4        (eee) Information prohibited from being disclosed 5    under subsection (b) of Section 75 of the Domestic 6    Violence Fatality Review Act. 7        (fff) Images from cameras under the Expressway Camera 8    Act and all automated license plate reader (ALPR) 9    information used and collected by the Illinois State 10    Police. "ALPR information" means information gathered by 11    an ALPR or created from the analysis of data generated by 12    an ALPR. This subsection (fff) is inoperative on and after 13    July 1, 2028.14        (ggg) Information prohibited from disclosure under 15    paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of Section 14 of the Nurse 16    Agency Licensing Act. 17        (hhh) Information submitted to the Illinois State 18    Police in an affidavit or application for an assault 19    weapon endorsement, assault weapon attachment endorsement, 20    .50 caliber rifle endorsement, or .50 caliber cartridge 21    endorsement under the Firearm Owners Identification Card 22    Act. 23        (iii) Data exempt from disclosure under Section 50 of 24    the School Safety Drill Act. 25        (jjj) Information exempt from disclosure under Section 26    30 of the Insurance Data Security Law.   SB2906- 58 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1        (kkk) Confidential business information prohibited 2    from disclosure under Section 45 of the Paint Stewardship 3    Act. 4        (lll) Data exempt from disclosure under Section 5    2-3.196 of the School Code. 6        (mmm) Information prohibited from being disclosed 7    under subsection (e) of Section 1-129 of the Illinois 8    Power Agency Act. 9        (nnn) Materials received by the Department of Commerce 10    and Economic Opportunity that are confidential under the 11    Music and Musicians Tax Credit and Jobs Act. 12        (ooo) Data or information provided pursuant to Section 13    20 of the Statewide Recycling Needs and Assessment Act. 14        (ppp) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 15    Section 28-11 of the Lawful Health Care Activity Act. 16        (qqq) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 17    Section 7-101 of the Illinois Human Rights Act. 18        (rrr) Information prohibited from being disclosed 19    under Section 4-2 of the Uniform Money Transmission 20    Modernization Act. 21        (sss) Information exempt from disclosure under Section 22    40 of the Student-Athlete Endorsement Rights Act.23        (ttt) Audio recordings made under Section 30 of the 24    Illinois State Police Act, except to the extent authorized 25    under that Section. 26        (uuu) Information prohibited from being disclosed   SB2906- 59 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1    under Section 30-5 of the Digital Assets Regulation Act.2        (vvv) Information prohibited or exempt from being 3    disclosed under the Transportation Network Driver Labor 4    Relations Act. 5(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-34, eff. 6-9-23; 6103-142, eff. 1-1-24; 103-372, eff. 1-1-24; 103-472, eff. 78-1-24; 103-508, eff. 8-4-23; 103-580, eff. 12-8-23; 103-592, 8eff. 6-7-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-636, eff. 7-1-24; 9103-724, eff. 1-1-25; 103-786, eff. 8-7-24; 103-859, eff. 108-9-24; 103-991, eff. 8-9-24; 103-1049, eff. 8-9-24; 103-1081, 11eff. 3-21-25; 104-10, eff. 6-16-25; 104-18, eff. 6-30-25; 12104-417, eff. 8-15-25; 104-428, eff. 8-18-25; revised 139-10-25.) 14    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-457 but 15before 104-441)16    Sec. 7.5. Statutory exemptions. To the extent provided for 17by the statutes referenced below, the following shall be 18exempt from inspection and copying:19        (a) All information determined to be confidential 20    under Section 4002 of the Technology Advancement and 21    Development Act.22        (b) Library circulation and order records identifying 23    library users with specific materials under the Library 24    Records Confidentiality Act.25        (c) Applications, related documents, and medical   SB2906- 60 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1    records received by the Experimental Organ Transplantation 2    Procedures Board and any and all documents or other 3    records prepared by the Experimental Organ Transplantation 4    Procedures Board or its staff relating to applications it 5    has received.6        (d) Information and records held by the Department of 7    Public Health and its authorized representatives relating 8    to known or suspected cases of sexually transmitted 9    infection or any information the disclosure of which is 10    restricted under the Illinois Sexually Transmitted 11    Infection Control Act.12        (e) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 13    under Section 30 of the Radon Industry Licensing Act.14        (f) Firm performance evaluations under Section 55 of 15    the Architectural, Engineering, and Land Surveying 16    Qualifications Based Selection Act.17        (g) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 18    and exempted under Section 50 of the Illinois Prepaid 19    Tuition Act.20        (h) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 21    under the State Officials and Employees Ethics Act, and 22    records of any lawfully created State or local inspector 23    general's office that would be exempt if created or 24    obtained by an Executive Inspector General's office under 25    that Act.26        (i) Information contained in a local emergency energy   SB2906- 61 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1    plan submitted to a municipality in accordance with a 2    local emergency energy plan ordinance that is adopted 3    under Section 11-21.5-5 of the Illinois Municipal Code.4        (j) Information and data concerning the distribution 5    of surcharge moneys collected and remitted by carriers 6    under the Emergency Telephone System Act.7        (k) Law enforcement officer identification information 8    or driver identification information compiled by a law 9    enforcement agency or the Department of Transportation 10    under Section 11-212 of the Illinois Vehicle Code.11        (l) Records and information provided to a residential 12    health care facility resident sexual assault and death 13    review team or the Executive Council under the Abuse 14    Prevention Review Team Act.15        (m) Information provided to the predatory lending 16    database created pursuant to Article 3 of the Residential 17    Real Property Disclosure Act, except to the extent 18    authorized under that Article.19        (n) Defense budgets and petitions for certification of 20    compensation and expenses for court appointed trial 21    counsel as provided under Sections 10 and 15 of the 22    Capital Crimes Litigation Act (repealed). This subsection 23    (n) shall apply until the conclusion of the trial of the 24    case, even if the prosecution chooses not to pursue the 25    death penalty prior to trial or sentencing.26        (o) Information that is prohibited from being   SB2906- 62 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1    disclosed under Section 4 of the Illinois Health and 2    Hazardous Substances Registry Act.3        (p) Security portions of system safety program plans, 4    investigation reports, surveys, schedules, lists, data, or 5    information compiled, collected, or prepared by or for the 6    Department of Transportation under Sections 2705-300 and 7    2705-616 of the Department of Transportation Law of the 8    Civil Administrative Code of Illinois, the Northern 9    Illinois Transit Authority under Section 2.11 of the 10    Northern Illinois Transit Authority Act, or the St. Clair 11    County Transit District under the Bi-State Transit Safety 12    Act (repealed). 13        (q) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the 14    Personnel Record Review Act. 15        (r) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the 16    Illinois School Student Records Act. 17        (s) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 18    under Section 5-108 of the Public Utilities Act. 19        (t) (Blank). 20        (u) Records and information provided to an independent 21    team of experts under the Developmental Disability and 22    Mental Health Safety Act (also known as Brian's Law). 23        (v) Names and information of people who have applied 24    for or received Firearm Owner's Identification Cards under 25    the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act or applied for 26    or received a concealed carry license under the Firearm   SB2906- 63 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1    Concealed Carry Act, unless otherwise authorized by the 2    Firearm Concealed Carry Act; and databases under the 3    Firearm Concealed Carry Act, records of the Concealed 4    Carry Licensing Review Board under the Firearm Concealed 5    Carry Act, and law enforcement agency objections under the 6    Firearm Concealed Carry Act. 7        (v-5) Records of the Firearm Owner's Identification 8    Card Review Board that are exempted from disclosure under 9    Section 10 of the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act.10        (w) Personally identifiable information which is 11    exempted from disclosure under subsection (g) of Section 12    19.1 of the Toll Highway Act.13        (x) Information which is exempted from disclosure 14    under Section 5-1014.3 of the Counties Code or Section 15    8-11-21 of the Illinois Municipal Code. 16        (y) Confidential information under the Adult 17    Protective Services Act and its predecessor enabling 18    statute, the Elder Abuse and Neglect Act, including 19    information about the identity and administrative finding 20    against any caregiver of a verified and substantiated 21    decision of abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation of 22    an eligible adult maintained in the Registry established 23    under Section 7.5 of the Adult Protective Services Act. 24        (z) Records and information provided to a fatality 25    review team or the Illinois Fatality Review Team Advisory 26    Council under Section 15 of the Adult Protective Services   SB2906- 64 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1    Act. 2        (aa) Information which is exempted from disclosure 3    under Section 2.37 of the Wildlife Code. 4        (bb) Information which is or was prohibited from 5    disclosure by the Juvenile Court Act of 1987. 6        (cc) Recordings made under the Law Enforcement 7    Officer-Worn Body Camera Act, except to the extent 8    authorized under that Act.9        (dd) Information that is prohibited from being 10    disclosed under Section 45 of the Condominium and Common 11    Interest Community Ombudsperson Act. 12        (ee) Information that is exempted from disclosure 13    under Section 30.1 of the Pharmacy Practice Act. 14        (ff) Information that is exempted from disclosure 15    under the Revised Uniform Unclaimed Property Act. 16        (gg) Information that is prohibited from being 17    disclosed under Section 7-603.5 of the Illinois Vehicle 18    Code. 19        (hh) Records that are exempt from disclosure under 20    Section 1A-16.7 of the Election Code. 21        (ii) Information which is exempted from disclosure 22    under Section 2505-800 of the Department of Revenue Law of 23    the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 24        (jj) Information and reports that are required to be 25    submitted to the Department of Labor by registering day 26    and temporary labor service agencies but are exempt from   SB2906- 65 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1    disclosure under subsection (a-1) of Section 45 of the Day 2    and Temporary Labor Services Act. 3        (kk) Information prohibited from disclosure under the 4    Seizure and Forfeiture Reporting Act. 5        (ll) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 6    and exempted under Section 5-30.8 of the Illinois Public 7    Aid Code. 8        (mm) Records that are exempt from disclosure under 9    Section 4.2 of the Crime Victims Compensation Act. 10        (nn) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 11    Section 70 of the Higher Education Student Assistance Act. 12        (oo) Communications, notes, records, and reports 13    arising out of a peer support counseling session 14    prohibited from disclosure under the First Responders 15    Suicide Prevention Act. 16        (pp) Names and all identifying information relating to 17    an employee of an emergency services provider or law 18    enforcement agency under the First Responders Suicide 19    Prevention Act. 20        (qq) Information and records held by the Department of 21    Public Health and its authorized representatives collected 22    under the Reproductive Health Act. 23        (rr) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 24    the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act. 25        (ss) Data reported by an employer to the Department of 26    Human Rights pursuant to Section 2-108 of the Illinois   SB2906- 66 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1    Human Rights Act.2        (tt) Recordings made under the Children's Advocacy 3    Center Act, except to the extent authorized under that 4    Act. 5        (uu) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 6    Section 50 of the Sexual Assault Evidence Submission Act. 7        (vv) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 8    subsections (f) and (j) of Section 5-36 of the Illinois 9    Public Aid Code. 10        (ww) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 11    Section 16.8 of the State Treasurer Act. 12        (xx) Information that is exempt from disclosure or 13    information that shall not be made public under the 14    Illinois Insurance Code. 15        (yy) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 16    the Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act.17        (zz) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 18    the Illinois Public Labor Relations Act. 19        (aaa) Information prohibited from being disclosed 20    under Section 1-167 of the Illinois Pension Code. 21        (bbb) Information that is prohibited from disclosure 22    by the Illinois Police Training Act and the Illinois State 23    Police Act. 24        (ccc) Records exempt from disclosure under Section 25    2605-304 of the Illinois State Police Law of the Civil 26    Administrative Code of Illinois.   SB2906- 67 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1        (ddd) Information prohibited from being disclosed 2    under Section 35 of the Address Confidentiality for 3    Victims of Domestic Violence, Sexual Assault, Human 4    Trafficking, or Stalking Act. 5        (eee) Information prohibited from being disclosed 6    under subsection (b) of Section 75 of the Domestic 7    Violence Fatality Review Act. 8        (fff) Images from cameras under the Expressway Camera 9    Act and all automated license plate reader (ALPR) 10    information used and collected by the Illinois State 11    Police. "ALPR information" means information gathered by 12    an ALPR or created from the analysis of data generated by 13    an ALPR. This subsection (fff) is inoperative on and after 14    July 1, 2028.15        (ggg) Information prohibited from disclosure under 16    paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of Section 14 of the Nurse 17    Agency Licensing Act. 18        (hhh) Information submitted to the Illinois State 19    Police in an affidavit or application for an assault 20    weapon endorsement, assault weapon attachment endorsement, 21    .50 caliber rifle endorsement, or .50 caliber cartridge 22    endorsement under the Firearm Owners Identification Card 23    Act. 24        (iii) Data exempt from disclosure under Section 50 of 25    the School Safety Drill Act. 26        (jjj) Information exempt from disclosure under Section   SB2906- 68 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1    30 of the Insurance Data Security Law. 2        (kkk) Confidential business information prohibited 3    from disclosure under Section 45 of the Paint Stewardship 4    Act. 5        (lll) Data exempt from disclosure under Section 6    2-3.196 of the School Code. 7        (mmm) Information prohibited from being disclosed 8    under subsection (e) of Section 1-129 of the Illinois 9    Power Agency Act. 10        (nnn) Materials received by the Department of Commerce 11    and Economic Opportunity that are confidential under the 12    Music and Musicians Tax Credit and Jobs Act. 13        (ooo) Data or information provided pursuant to Section 14    20 of the Statewide Recycling Needs and Assessment Act. 15        (ppp) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 16    Section 28-11 of the Lawful Health Care Activity Act. 17        (qqq) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 18    Section 7-101 of the Illinois Human Rights Act. 19        (rrr) Information prohibited from being disclosed 20    under Section 4-2 of the Uniform Money Transmission 21    Modernization Act. 22        (sss) Information exempt from disclosure under Section 23    40 of the Student-Athlete Endorsement Rights Act.24        (ttt) Audio recordings made under Section 30 of the 25    Illinois State Police Act, except to the extent authorized 26    under that Section.   SB2906- 69 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1        (uuu) Information prohibited from being disclosed 2    under Section 30-5 of the Digital Assets Regulation Act.3        (vvv) Information prohibited or exempt from being 4    disclosed under the Transportation Network Driver Labor 5    Relations Act. 6(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-34, eff. 6-9-23; 7103-142, eff. 1-1-24; 103-372, eff. 1-1-24; 103-472, eff. 88-1-24; 103-508, eff. 8-4-23; 103-580, eff. 12-8-23; 103-592, 9eff. 6-7-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-636, eff. 7-1-24; 10103-724, eff. 1-1-25; 103-786, eff. 8-7-24; 103-859, eff. 118-9-24; 103-991, eff. 8-9-24; 103-1049, eff. 8-9-24; 103-1081, 12eff. 3-21-25; 104-10, eff. 6-16-25; 104-18, eff. 6-30-25; 13104-417, eff. 8-15-25; 104-428, eff. 8-18-25; 104-457, eff. 146-1-26; revised 1-7-26.) 15    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-441)16    Sec. 7.5. Statutory exemptions. To the extent provided for 17by the statutes referenced below, the following shall be 18exempt from inspection and copying:19        (a) All information determined to be confidential 20    under Section 4002 of the Technology Advancement and 21    Development Act.22        (b) Library circulation and order records identifying 23    library users with specific materials under the Library 24    Records Confidentiality Act.25        (c) Applications, related documents, and medical   SB2906- 70 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1    records received by the Experimental Organ Transplantation 2    Procedures Board and any and all documents or other 3    records prepared by the Experimental Organ Transplantation 4    Procedures Board or its staff relating to applications it 5    has received.6        (d) Information and records held by the Department of 7    Public Health and its authorized representatives relating 8    to known or suspected cases of sexually transmitted 9    infection or any information the disclosure of which is 10    restricted under the Illinois Sexually Transmitted 11    Infection Control Act.12        (e) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 13    under Section 30 of the Radon Industry Licensing Act.14        (f) Firm performance evaluations under Section 55 of 15    the Architectural, Engineering, and Land Surveying 16    Qualifications Based Selection Act.17        (g) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 18    and exempted under Section 50 of the Illinois Prepaid 19    Tuition Act.20        (h) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 21    under the State Officials and Employees Ethics Act, and 22    records of any lawfully created State or local inspector 23    general's office that would be exempt if created or 24    obtained by an Executive Inspector General's office under 25    that Act.26        (i) Information contained in a local emergency energy   SB2906- 71 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1    plan submitted to a municipality in accordance with a 2    local emergency energy plan ordinance that is adopted 3    under Section 11-21.5-5 of the Illinois Municipal Code.4        (j) Information and data concerning the distribution 5    of surcharge moneys collected and remitted by carriers 6    under the Emergency Telephone System Act.7        (k) Law enforcement officer identification information 8    or driver identification information compiled by a law 9    enforcement agency or the Department of Transportation 10    under Section 11-212 of the Illinois Vehicle Code.11        (l) Records and information provided to a residential 12    health care facility resident sexual assault and death 13    review team or the Executive Council under the Abuse 14    Prevention Review Team Act.15        (m) Information provided to the predatory lending 16    database created pursuant to Article 3 of the Residential 17    Real Property Disclosure Act, except to the extent 18    authorized under that Article.19        (n) Defense budgets and petitions for certification of 20    compensation and expenses for court appointed trial 21    counsel as provided under Sections 10 and 15 of the 22    Capital Crimes Litigation Act (repealed). This subsection 23    (n) shall apply until the conclusion of the trial of the 24    case, even if the prosecution chooses not to pursue the 25    death penalty prior to trial or sentencing.26        (o) Information that is prohibited from being   SB2906- 72 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1    disclosed under Section 4 of the Illinois Health and 2    Hazardous Substances Registry Act.3        (p) Security portions of system safety program plans, 4    investigation reports, surveys, schedules, lists, data, or 5    information compiled, collected, or prepared by or for the 6    Department of Transportation under Sections 2705-300 and 7    2705-616 of the Department of Transportation Law of the 8    Civil Administrative Code of Illinois, the Northern 9    Illinois Transit Authority under Section 2.11 of the 10    Northern Illinois Transit Authority Act, or the St. Clair 11    County Transit District under the Bi-State Transit Safety 12    Act (repealed). 13        (q) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the 14    Personnel Record Review Act. 15        (r) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the 16    Illinois School Student Records Act. 17        (s) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 18    under Section 5-108 of the Public Utilities Act. 19        (t) (Blank). 20        (u) Records and information provided to an independent 21    team of experts under the Developmental Disability and 22    Mental Health Safety Act (also known as Brian's Law). 23        (v) Names and information of people who have applied 24    for or received Firearm Owner's Identification Cards under 25    the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act or applied for 26    or received a concealed carry license under the Firearm   SB2906- 73 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1    Concealed Carry Act, unless otherwise authorized by the 2    Firearm Concealed Carry Act; and databases under the 3    Firearm Concealed Carry Act, records of the Concealed 4    Carry Licensing Review Board under the Firearm Concealed 5    Carry Act, and law enforcement agency objections under the 6    Firearm Concealed Carry Act. 7        (v-5) Records of the Firearm Owner's Identification 8    Card Review Board that are exempted from disclosure under 9    Section 10 of the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act.10        (w) Personally identifiable information which is 11    exempted from disclosure under subsection (g) of Section 12    19.1 of the Toll Highway Act.13        (x) Information which is exempted from disclosure 14    under Section 5-1014.3 of the Counties Code or Section 15    8-11-21 of the Illinois Municipal Code. 16        (y) Confidential information under the Adult 17    Protective Services Act and its predecessor enabling 18    statute, the Elder Abuse and Neglect Act, including 19    information about the identity and administrative finding 20    against any caregiver of a verified and substantiated 21    decision of abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation of 22    an eligible adult maintained in the Registry established 23    under Section 7.5 of the Adult Protective Services Act. 24        (z) Records and information provided to a fatality 25    review team or the Illinois Fatality Review Team Advisory 26    Council under Section 15 of the Adult Protective Services   SB2906- 74 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1    Act. 2        (aa) Information which is exempted from disclosure 3    under Section 2.37 of the Wildlife Code. 4        (bb) Information which is or was prohibited from 5    disclosure by the Juvenile Court Act of 1987. 6        (cc) Recordings made under the Law Enforcement 7    Officer-Worn Body Camera Act, except to the extent 8    authorized under that Act.9        (dd) Information that is prohibited from being 10    disclosed under Section 45 of the Condominium and Common 11    Interest Community Ombudsperson Act. 12        (ee) Information that is exempted from disclosure 13    under Section 30.1 of the Pharmacy Practice Act. 14        (ff) Information that is exempted from disclosure 15    under the Revised Uniform Unclaimed Property Act. 16        (gg) Information that is prohibited from being 17    disclosed under Section 7-603.5 of the Illinois Vehicle 18    Code. 19        (hh) Records that are exempt from disclosure under 20    Section 1A-16.7 of the Election Code. 21        (ii) Information which is exempted from disclosure 22    under Section 2505-800 of the Department of Revenue Law of 23    the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 24        (jj) Information and reports that are required to be 25    submitted to the Department of Labor by registering day 26    and temporary labor service agencies but are exempt from   SB2906- 75 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1    disclosure under subsection (a-1) of Section 45 of the Day 2    and Temporary Labor Services Act. 3        (kk) Information prohibited from disclosure under the 4    Seizure and Forfeiture Reporting Act. 5        (ll) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 6    and exempted under Section 5-30.8 of the Illinois Public 7    Aid Code. 8        (mm) Records that are exempt from disclosure under 9    Section 4.2 of the Crime Victims Compensation Act. 10        (nn) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 11    Section 70 of the Higher Education Student Assistance Act. 12        (oo) Communications, notes, records, and reports 13    arising out of a peer support counseling session 14    prohibited from disclosure under the First Responders 15    Suicide Prevention Act. 16        (pp) Names and all identifying information relating to 17    an employee of an emergency services provider or law 18    enforcement agency under the First Responders Suicide 19    Prevention Act. 20        (qq) Information and records held by the Department of 21    Public Health and its authorized representatives collected 22    under the Reproductive Health Act. 23        (rr) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 24    the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act. 25        (ss) Data reported by an employer to the Department of 26    Human Rights pursuant to Section 2-108 of the Illinois   SB2906- 76 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1    Human Rights Act.2        (tt) Recordings made under the Children's Advocacy 3    Center Act, except to the extent authorized under that 4    Act. 5        (uu) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 6    Section 50 of the Sexual Assault Evidence Submission Act. 7        (vv) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 8    subsections (f) and (j) of Section 5-36 of the Illinois 9    Public Aid Code. 10        (ww) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 11    Section 16.8 of the State Treasurer Act. 12        (xx) Information that is exempt from disclosure or 13    information that shall not be made public under the 14    Illinois Insurance Code. 15        (yy) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 16    the Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act.17        (zz) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 18    the Illinois Public Labor Relations Act. 19        (aaa) Information prohibited from being disclosed 20    under Section 1-167 of the Illinois Pension Code. 21        (bbb) Information that is prohibited from disclosure 22    by the Illinois Police Training Act and the Illinois State 23    Police Act. 24        (ccc) Records exempt from disclosure under Section 25    2605-304 of the Illinois State Police Law of the Civil 26    Administrative Code of Illinois.   SB2906- 77 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1        (ddd) Information prohibited from being disclosed 2    under Section 35 of the Address Confidentiality for 3    Victims of Domestic Violence, Sexual Assault, Human 4    Trafficking, or Stalking Act. 5        (eee) Information prohibited from being disclosed 6    under subsection (b) of Section 75 of the Domestic 7    Violence Fatality Review Act. 8        (fff) Images from cameras under the Expressway Camera 9    Act and all automated license plate reader (ALPR) 10    information used and collected by the Illinois State 11    Police. "ALPR information" means information gathered by 12    an ALPR or created from the analysis of data generated by 13    an ALPR. This subsection (fff) is inoperative on and after 14    July 1, 2028.15        (ggg) Information prohibited from disclosure under 16    paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of Section 14 of the Nurse 17    Agency Licensing Act. 18        (hhh) Information submitted to the Illinois State 19    Police in an affidavit or application for an assault 20    weapon endorsement, assault weapon attachment endorsement, 21    .50 caliber rifle endorsement, or .50 caliber cartridge 22    endorsement under the Firearm Owners Identification Card 23    Act. 24        (iii) Data exempt from disclosure under Section 50 of 25    the School Safety Drill Act. 26        (jjj) Information exempt from disclosure under Section   SB2906- 78 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1    30 of the Insurance Data Security Law. 2        (kkk) Confidential business information prohibited 3    from disclosure under Section 45 of the Paint Stewardship 4    Act. 5        (lll) Data exempt from disclosure under Section 6    2-3.196 of the School Code. 7        (mmm) Information prohibited from being disclosed 8    under subsection (e) of Section 1-129 of the Illinois 9    Power Agency Act. 10        (nnn) Materials received by the Department of Commerce 11    and Economic Opportunity that are confidential under the 12    Music and Musicians Tax Credit and Jobs Act. 13        (ooo) Data or information provided pursuant to Section 14    20 of the Statewide Recycling Needs and Assessment Act. 15        (ppp) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 16    Section 28-11 of the Lawful Health Care Activity Act. 17        (qqq) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 18    Section 7-101 of the Illinois Human Rights Act. 19        (rrr) Information prohibited from being disclosed 20    under Section 4-2 of the Uniform Money Transmission 21    Modernization Act. 22        (sss) Information exempt from disclosure under Section 23    40 of the Student-Athlete Endorsement Rights Act.24        (ttt) Audio recordings made under Section 30 of the 25    Illinois State Police Act, except to the extent authorized 26    under that Section.   SB2906- 79 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1        (uuu) Information prohibited from being disclosed 2    under Section 30-5 of the Digital Assets Regulation Act.3        (vvv) (uuu) Information exempt from disclosure under 4    Section 70 of the End-of-Life Options for Terminally Ill 5    Patients Act.6        (www) Information prohibited or exempt from being 7    disclosed under the Transportation Network Driver Labor 8    Relations Act. 9(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-34, eff. 6-9-23; 10103-142, eff. 1-1-24; 103-372, eff. 1-1-24; 103-472, eff. 118-1-24; 103-508, eff. 8-4-23; 103-580, eff. 12-8-23; 103-592, 12eff. 6-7-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-636, eff. 7-1-24; 13103-724, eff. 1-1-25; 103-786, eff. 8-7-24; 103-859, eff. 148-9-24; 103-991, eff. 8-9-24; 103-1049, eff. 8-9-24; 103-1081, 15eff. 3-21-25; 104-10, eff. 6-16-25; 104-18, eff. 6-30-25; 16104-417, eff. 8-15-25; 104-428, eff. 8-18-25; 104-441, eff. 179-12-26; 104-457, eff. 6-1-26; revised 1-7-26.) 18    Section 910. The Labor Dispute Act is amended by changing 19Section 1.3 as follows: 20    (820 ILCS 5/1.3)21    Sec. 1.3. Definitions. As used in Section 1.2 through 1.5:22    "Employee" means any individual permitted to work by an 23employer in an occupation. "Employee" includes any 24transportation network driver, as that term is defined in the   SB2906- 80 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1Transportation Network Driver Labor Relations Act. 2    "Employer" means any individual, partnership, association, 3corporation, business trust, governmental or 4quasi-governmental body, or any person or group of persons 5that employs any person to work, labor, or exercise skill in 6connection with the operation of any business, industry, 7vocation, or occupation. "Employer" includes any 8transportation network company, as defined in the 9Transportation Network Driver Labor Relations Act, with 10respect to its engagement or contracting of transportation 11network drivers. With respect to transportation network 12drivers and transportation network companies, the term 13"employment" shall include the engagement or contracting of a 14transportation network driver by a transportation network 15company to provide transportation network company services, as 16those terms are defined in the Transportation Network Driver 17Labor Relations Act. 18    "Picketing" means the stationing of a person for an 19organization to apprise the public by signs or other means of 20the existence of a dispute pursuant to the National Labor 21Relations Act, 29 U.S.C. 151 et seq., and the Labor Management 22Relations Act, 29 U.S.C. 141 et seq, or the Transportation 23Network Driver Labor Relations Act.24    "Dispute" includes any controversy concerning terms or 25conditions of employment, or concerning the association or 26representation of persons in negotiating, fixing, maintaining,   SB2906- 81 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1changing, or seeking to arrange terms or conditions of 2employment or other protest, regardless of whether or not the 3disputants stand in the proximate relationship of employer and 4employee.5    "Public right of way" means that portion of the highway or 6street adjacent to the roadway for accommodating stopped 7vehicles or for emergency use; or that portion of a street 8between the curb lines, or the lateral lines of a roadway, and 9the adjacent property lines. 10    "Temporary sign" means a sign or other display or device 11that is not permanently affixed and is capable of being 12removed at the end of each day or shift.13    "Temporary shelter" means a tent or shelter that is not 14permanently affixed and is capable of being removed at the end 15of each day or shift, not to exceed 300 square feet in size.16(Source: P.A. 94-321, eff. 1-1-06.) 17    Section 995. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act 18makes changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by 19text that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a 20Section represented by multiple versions), the use of that 21text does not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the 22changes made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any 23other Public Act. 24    Section 997. Severability. The provisions of this Act   SB2906- 82 -LRB104 18506 SPS 31948 b1shall be severable as provided in Section 1.31 of the Statute 2on Statutes; notwithstanding that, if the definition of the 3"transportation network driver" is held to be preempted by the 4National Labor Relations Act, 29 U.S.C. 141 et seq., by a court 5of competent jurisdiction and such determination is not 6reversed after exhaustion of all appeals, no provision of this 7Act shall be deemed valid or given force of law. 8    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 9becoming law.